Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-876
Association records.

The association shall keep financial records sufficiently detailed to enable the association to comply with section 76-884. All financial and other records of the association shall be made reasonably available for examination by any unit owner and his or her authorized agents.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 52.